Maryland, session 2026, HB1234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
10–601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(nn) [(1)] “Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor facility” means a facility
located within the Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor that is:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1234*

HOUSE BILL 1234
[(i)] (1) a convention center;
[(ii)] (2) an arts and entertainment amphitheater; [and]
(3) A MARKET HALL;
(4) A SPORTS FACILITY, INCLUDING A SPORTS STADIUM, PRACTICE
FIELD, OR TEAM HEADQUARTERS;
(5) A MIXED–USE DEVELOPMENT;
(6) A TECHNOLOGY INNOVATION CENTER;
(7) RELATED TO COMMERCIAL DEVELOPMENT AND REVITALIZATION;
AND
[(iii)] (8) any other functionally related structures, improvements,
infrastructure, furnishings, or equipment of the facility, including parking garages.
[(2) “Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor facility” does not include a
sports facility.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.